District of Columbia statutes.
7-139

Interference unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly to obstruct, resist, oppose, or interfere with any person performing any duty or function under the authority of this subchapter or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder.

Aug. 11, 1939, ch. 601, § 9
Aug. 8, 1946, 60 Stat. 922, ch. 871, § 2
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-83, § 3(e), 32 DCR 7276
This section is referenced in § 7-140.
1981 Ed., § 6-125.
1973 Ed., § 6-119g.